Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.105.040

Changes in eligibility—Consequences.

(1) If the student enrolls in a qualified program or declares a qualified major and the program or major is subsequently removed from the list of qualified programs and qualified majors by the office and the program administrator, the student's eligibility to receive a GET ready for math and science scholarship shall not be affected.

(2) If a student who received a GET ready for math and science scholarship ceases to be enrolled in an institution of higher education, withdraws or is no longer enrolled in a qualified program, declares a major that is not a qualified major, or otherwise is no longer eligible to receive a GET ready for math and science scholarship, the student shall notify the program administrator as soon as practicable and is not eligible for further GET ready for math and science scholarship awards. Such a student shall also repay the amount of the GET ready for math and science scholarship awarded to the student as required by RCW 28B.105.050.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 184; 2007 c 214 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.